test/tools/spellcheckers/listbased/hunspell/vuolgit.aff
SET UTF-8

SFX A Y 16
SFX A olgi lge lgi
SFX A olgi lgen lgi
SFX A olgi lget lgi
SFX A olgi lggii lgi
SFX A olgi lggiide lgi
SFX A olgi lggiidet lgi
SFX A olgi lggiiga lgi
SFX A olgi lggiime lgi
SFX A olgi lggiimet lgi
SFX A lgi lggán lgi
SFX A lgi lggát lgi
SFX A lgi lgiba lgi
SFX A lgi lgibeahtti lgi
SFX A lgi lgibehtet lgi
SFX A 0 t .
SFX A lgi lgá lgi
